Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
PART 4 Rights of Third Parties

11-9-401.
Alienability of debtor’s rights.

Other law governs alienability; exceptions.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section and Code Sections 11-9-406, 11-9-407, 11-9-408, and 11-9-409, whether a debtor’s rights in collateral may be voluntarily or involuntarily transferred is governed by law other than this article.

Agreement does not prevent transfer.An agreement between the debtor and secured party which prohibits a transfer of the debtor’s rights in collateral or makes the transfer a default does not prevent the transfer from taking effect.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-401, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-402.
Secured party not obligated on contract of debtor or in tort.

The existence of a security interest, agricultural lien, or authority given to a debtor to dispose of or use collateral, without more, does not subject a secured party to liability in contract or tort for the debtor’s acts or omissions.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-402, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-403.
Agreement not to assert defenses against assignee.

“Value.” As used in this Code section, the term “value” has the meaning provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 11-3-303.

Agreement not to assert claim or defense.Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, an agreement between an account debtor and an assignor not to assert against an assignee any claim or defense that the account debtor may have against the assignor is enforceable by an assignee that takes an assignment:

For value;

In good faith;

Without notice of a claim of a property or possessory right to the property assigned; and

Without notice of a defense or claim in recoupment of the type that may be asserted against a person entitled to enforce a negotiable instrument under subsection (a) of Code Section 11-3-305.

When subsection (b) of this Code section not applicable.Subsection (b) of this Code section does not apply to defenses of a type that may be asserted against a holder in due course of a negotiable instrument under subsection (b) of Code Section 11-3-305.

Omission of required statement in consumer transaction.In a consumer transaction, if a record evidences the account debtor’s obligation, law other than this article requires that the record include a statement to the effect that the rights of an assignee are subject to claims or defenses that the account debtor could assert against the original obligee, and the record does not include such a statement:

The record has the same effect as if the record included such a statement; and

The account debtor may assert against an assignee those claims and defenses that would have been available if the record included such a statement.

Rule for individual under other law.This Code section is subject to law other than this article which establishes a different rule for an account debtor who is an individual and who incurred the obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

Other law not displaced.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, this Code section does not displace law other than this article which gives effect to an agreement by an account debtor not to assert a claim or defense against an assignee.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-403, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

Party-to-the-transaction rule. —

For a discussion of the party-to-the-transaction rule as a defense to the holder in due course status, see Design Eng'g, Constr. Int'l, Inc. v. Cessna Fin. Corp., 164 Ga. App. 159, 296 S.E.2d 195 (1982) (decided under former Code Section11-9-206).

11-9-404.
Rights acquired by assignee; claims and defenses against assignee.

Assignee’s rights subject to terms, claims, and defenses; exceptions.Unless an account debtor has made an enforceable agreement not to assert defenses or claims and subject to subsections (b) through (e) of this Code section, the rights of an assignee are subject to:

All terms of the agreement between the account debtor and assignor and any defense or claim in recoupment arising from the transaction that gave rise to the contract; and

Any other defense or claim of the account debtor against the assignor which accrues before the account debtor receives a notification of the assignment authenticated by the assignor or the assignee.

Account debtor’s claim reduces amount owed to assignee.Subject to subsection (c) of this Code section and except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, the claim of an account debtor against an assignor may be asserted against an assignee under subsection (a) of this Code section only to reduce the amount the account debtor owes.

Rule for individual under other law.This Code section is subject to law other than this article which establishes a different rule for an account debtor who is an individual and who incurred the obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

Omission of required statement in consumer transaction.In a consumer transaction, if a record evidences the account debtor’s obligation, law other than this article requires that the record include a statement to the effect that the account debtor’s recovery against an assignee with respect to claims and defenses against the assignor may not exceed amounts paid by the account debtor under the record, and the record does not include such a statement, the extent to which a claim of an account debtor against the assignor may be asserted against an assignee is determined as if the record included such a statement.

Inapplicability to health care insurance receivable.This Code section does not apply to an assignment of a health care insurance receivable.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-404, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-405.
Modification of assigned contract.

Effect of modification on assignee.A modification of or substitution for an assigned contract is effective against an assignee if made in good faith. The assignee acquires corresponding rights under the modified or substituted contract. The assignment may provide that the modification or substitution is a breach of contract by the assignor. This subsection is subject to subsections (b) through (d) of this Code section.

Applicability of subsection (a) of this Code section.Subsection (a) of this Code section applies to the extent that:

The right to payment or a part thereof under an assigned contract has not been fully earned by performance; or

The right to payment or a part thereof has been fully earned by performance and the account debtor has not received notification of the assignment under subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-406.

Rule for individual under other law.This Code section is subject to law other than this article which establishes a different rule for an account debtor who is an individual and who incurred the obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

Inapplicability to health care insurance receivable.This Code section does not apply to an assignment of a health care insurance receivable.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-405, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-406.
Discharge of account debtor; notification of assignment; identification and proof of assignment; restrictions on assignment of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, and promissory notes ineffective.

Discharge of account debtor; effect of notification.Subject to subsections (b) through (i) of this Code section, an account debtor on an account, chattel paper, or a payment intangible may discharge its obligation by paying the assignor until, but not after, the account debtor receives a notification, authenticated by the assignor or the assignee, that the amount due or to become due has been assigned and that payment is to be made to the assignee. After receipt of the notification, the account debtor may discharge its obligation by paying the assignee and may not discharge the obligation by paying the assignor.

When notification ineffective.Subject to subsection (h) of this Code section, notification is ineffective under subsection (a) of this Code section:

If it does not reasonably identify the rights assigned;

To the extent that an agreement between an account debtor and a seller of a payment intangible limits the account debtor’s duty to pay a person other than the seller and the limitation is effective under law other than this article; or

At the option of an account debtor, if the notification notifies the account debtor to make less than the full amount of any installment or other periodic payment to the assignee, even if:

Only a portion of the account, chattel paper, or payment intangible has been assigned to that assignee;

A portion has been assigned to another assignee; or

The account debtor knows that the assignment to that assignee is limited.

Proof of assignment.Subject to subsection (h) of this Code section, if requested by the account debtor, an assignee shall seasonably furnish reasonable proof that the assignment has been made. Unless the assignee complies, the account debtor may discharge its obligation by paying the assignor, even if the account debtor has received a notification under subsection (a) of this Code section.

Term restricting assignment generally ineffective.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this Code section and Code Sections 11-2A-303, 11-9-407, and 53-12-80 through 53-12-83 and subject to subsection (h) of this Code section, a term in an agreement between an account debtor and an assignor or in a promissory note shall be ineffective to the extent that it:

Prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of the account debtor or person obligated on the promissory note to the assignment or transfer of, or the creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest in, the account, chattel paper, payment intangible, or promissory note; or

Provides that the assignment, transfer, creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the account, chattel paper, payment intangible, or promissory note.

Inapplicability of subsection (d) of this Code section to certain sales.Subsection (d) of this Code section does not apply to the sale of a payment intangible or promissory note, other than a sale pursuant to a disposition under Code Section 11-9-610 or an acceptance of collateral under Code Section 11-9-620.

Legal restrictions on assignment generally ineffective.Except as otherwise provided in Code Sections 11-2A-303 and 11-9-407 and subject to subsections (h) and (i) of this Code section, a rule of law, statute, or regulation that prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of a government, governmental body or official, or account debtor to the assignment or transfer of, or creation of a security interest in, an account or chattel paper is ineffective to the extent that the rule of law, statute, or regulation:

Prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of the government, governmental body or official, or account debtor to the assignment or transfer of, or the creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest, in the account or chattel paper; or

Provides that the assignment, transfer, creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the account or chattel paper.

Paragraph (3) of subsection (b) not waivable.Subject to subsection (h) of this Code section, an account debtor may not waive or vary its option under paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section.

Rule for individual under other law.This Code section is subject to law other than this article which establishes a different rule for an account debtor who is an individual and who incurred the obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

Inapplicability to health care insurance receivable.This Code section does not apply to an assignment of a health care insurance receivable.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-406, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 6/SB 131; Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 8/SB 185.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in the introductory paragraph of subsection (d), substituted “and 53-12-80 through 53-12-83” for “and 53-12-28” in the middle and substituted “shall be” for “is” near the end.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “, other than a sale pursuant to a disposition under Code Section 11-9-610 or an acceptance of collateral under Code Section 11-9-620” at the end of subsection (e).

11-9-407.
Restrictions on creation or enforcement of security interest in leasehold interest or in lessor’s residual interest.

Term restricting assignment generally ineffective.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, a term in a lease agreement is ineffective to the extent that it:

Prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of a party to the lease to the assignment, transfer, creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest in an interest of a party under the lease contract or in the lessor’s residual interest in the goods; or

Provides that the assignment, transfer, creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the lease.

Effectiveness of certain terms.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of Code Section 11-2A-303, a term described in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section is effective to the extent that there is:

A transfer by the lessee of the lessee’s right of possession or use of the goods in violation of the term; or

A delegation of a material performance of either party to the lease contract in violation of the term.

Security interest not material impairment.The creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest in the lessor’s interest under the lease contract or the lessor’s residual interest in the goods is not a transfer that materially impairs the lessee’s prospect of obtaining return performance or materially changes the duty of or materially increases the burden or risk imposed on the lessee within the purview of subsection (4) of Code Section 11-2A-303 unless, and then only to the extent that, enforcement actually results in a delegation of material performance of the lessor.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-407, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-408.
Restrictions on assignment of promissory notes, health care insurance receivables, and certain general intangibles ineffective.

Term restricting assignment generally ineffective.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section or in Code Section 53-12-80, a term in a promissory note or in an agreement between an account debtor and a debtor which relates to a health care insurance receivable or a general intangible, including a contract, permit, license, or franchise, and which term prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of the person obligated on the promissory note or the account debtor to the assignment or transfer of, or creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest in, the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible, shall be ineffective to the extent that the term:

Would impair the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest; or

Provides that the assignment, transfer, creation, attachment, or perfection of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible.

Applicability of subsection (a) of this Code section to sales of certain rights to payment.Subsection (a) of this Code section applies to a security interest in a payment intangible or promissory note only if the security interest arises out of a sale of the payment intangible or promissory note, other than a sale pursuant to a disposition under Code Section 11-9-610 or an acceptance of collateral under Code Section 11-9-620.

Legal restrictions on assignment generally ineffective.Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 53-12-80, a rule of law, statute, or regulation that prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of a government, governmental body or official, person obligated on a promissory note, or account debtor to the assignment or transfer of, or creation of a security interest in, a promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible, including a contract, permit, license, or franchise between an account debtor and a debtor, shall be ineffective to the extent that the rule of law, statute, or regulation:

Would impair the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest; or

Provides that the assignment, transfer, creation, attachment, or perfection of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible.

Limitation on ineffectiveness under subsections (a) and (c) of this Code section.To the extent that a term in a promissory note or in an agreement between an account debtor and a debtor which relates to a health care insurance receivable or general intangible or a rule of law, statute, or regulation described in subsection (c) of this Code section would be effective under law other than this article but is ineffective under subsection (a) or (c) of this Code section, the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest in the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible:

Is not enforceable against the person obligated on the promissory note or the account debtor;

Does not impose a duty or obligation on the person obligated on the promissory note or the account debtor;

Does not require the person obligated on the promissory note or the account debtor to recognize the security interest, pay or render performance to the secured party, or accept payment or performance from the secured party;

Does not entitle the secured party to use or assign the debtor’s rights under the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible, including any related information or materials furnished to the debtor in the transaction giving rise to the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible;

Does not entitle the secured party to use, assign, possess, or have access to any trade secrets or confidential information of the person obligated on the promissory note or the account debtor; and

Does not entitle the secured party to enforce the security interest in the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-408, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 7/SB 131; Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 9/SB 185.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in the introductory paragraphs of subsections (a) and (c), substituted “Code Section 53-12-80” for “Code Section 53-12-28” and substituted “shall be ineffective” for “is ineffective” near the end; deleted “assignment, transfer,” preceding “creation, attachment,” in paragraph (c)(1); and inserted “assignment, transfer,” near the beginning of paragraph (c)(2).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “, other than a sale pursuant to a disposition under Code Section 11-9-610 or an acceptance of collateral under Code Section 11-9-620” at the end of subsection (b).

11-9-409.
Restrictions on assignment of letter of credit rights ineffective.

Term or law restricting assignment generally ineffective.A term in a letter of credit or a rule of law, statute, regulation, custom, or practice applicable to the letter of credit which prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of an applicant, issuer, or nominated person to a beneficiary’s assignment of or creation of a security interest in a letter of credit right is ineffective to the extent that the term or rule of law, statute, regulation, custom, or practice:

Would impair the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest in the letter of credit right; or

Provides that the assignment, transfer, creation, attachment, or perfection of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the letter of credit right.

Limitation on ineffectiveness under subsection (a) of this Code section.To the extent that a term in a letter of credit is ineffective under subsection (a) of this Code section but would be effective under law other than this article or a custom or practice applicable to the letter of credit, to the transfer of a right to draw or otherwise demand performance under the letter of credit, or to the assignment of a right to proceeds of the letter of credit, the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest in the letter of credit right:

Is not enforceable against the applicant, issuer, nominated person, or transferee beneficiary;

Imposes no duties or obligations on the applicant, issuer, nominated person, or transferee beneficiary; and

Does not require the applicant, issuer, nominated person, or transferee beneficiary to recognize the security interest, pay or render performance to the secured party, or accept payment or other performance from the secured party.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-409, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.